Utah statutes.
53A-11-905.   Delegation of authority to suspend or expel a student -- Procedure for suspension -- Readmission.

(1) (a)  A local board of education may delegate to any school principal or assistant principal within the school district the power to suspend a student in the principal's school for up to 10 school days.

(b)  A governing board of a charter school may delegate to the chief administrative officer of the charter school the power to suspend a student in the charter school for up to 10 school days.

(2)  The board may suspend a student for up to one school year or delegate that power to  the district superintendent, the superintendent's designee, or chief administrative officer of a charter school.

(3)  The board may expel a student for a fixed or indefinite period, provided that the expulsion shall be reviewed by the district superintendent or the superintendent's designee and the conclusions reported to the board, at least once each year.

(4)  If a student is suspended, a designated school official shall notify the parent or guardian of the student of the following without delay:

(a)  that the student has been suspended;

(b)  the grounds for the suspension;

(c)  the period of time for which the student is suspended; and

(d)  the time and place for the parent or guardian to meet with a designated school official to review the suspension.

(5) (a)  A suspended student shall immediately leave the school building and the school grounds following a determination by the school of the best way to transfer custody of the student to the parent or guardian or other person authorized by the parent or applicable law to accept custody of the student.

(b)  Except as otherwise provided in Subsection (5)(c), a suspended student may not be readmitted to a public school until:

(i)  the student and the parent or guardian have met with a designated school official to review the suspension and agreed upon a plan to avoid recurrence of the problem; or

(ii)  in the discretion of the principal or chief administrative officer of a charter school, the parent or guardian of the suspended student and the student have agreed to participate in such a meeting.

(c)  A suspension may not extend beyond 10 school days unless the student and the student's parent or guardian have been given a reasonable opportunity to meet with a designated school official and respond to the allegations and proposed disciplinary action.

